Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-150
Interstate compact; department; powers; effect.

The department may develop, participate in the development of, negotiate, and enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of this state with other states to implement one or more of the purposes set forth in sections 43-147 to 43-154. When entered into and for so long as it shall remain in force, such a compact shall have the force and effect of law.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 4.